Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.435

Rural workforce pilot projects. (Expires July 1, 2026.)

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the *commission, in collaboration with rural hospitals, relevant employer and exclusive bargaining unit partnerships, nursing assistant-certified training programs, the department of health, and the department of labor and industries, shall establish at least two pilot projects for rural hospitals to utilize high school students who are training to become nursing assistant-certified or high school students who are nursing assistant-certified to help address the workforce shortages and promote nursing careers in rural hospitals. As part of the program, students must receive information about related careers and educational and training opportunities including certified medical assistants, licensed practical nurses, and registered nurses.

(2) At least one of the rural hospitals participating in the pilot projects must be east of the crest of the Cascade mountains and at least one of the rural hospitals participating in the pilot projects must be west of the crest of the Cascade mountains.

(3) The pilot projects shall prioritize using the nursing assistant-certified high school students to their full scope of practice and identify any barriers to doing this.

(4) The *commission may contract with an employer and exclusive bargaining unit partnership, nursing consultant, and health services consultant to assist with establishing and supporting the pilot project, including identifying participants, coordinating with the groups and agencies as referenced in subsection (1) of this section and other stakeholders, and preparing reports to the legislature.

(5) The *commission shall submit a report, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, to the health care committees of the legislature by December 1, 2024, and December 1, 2025, with the status of the pilot projects and any findings and recommendations.

(6) This section expires July 1, 2026.

[2023 c 126 s 11.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: The reference to "nursing care quality assurance commission" was changed to "board of nursing" by 2023 c 123.

Findings—2023 c 126: See note following RCW 28B.50.800.